Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.38.005

Trust business at a trust office.

(1) An out-of-state trust institution that meets the requirements of this chapter is not required to maintain a physical trust office in Washington state.

(2) An out-of-state trust institution that does not operate a trust office in Washington state and that meets the requirements of this chapter may establish and maintain a new trust office in Washington state.

(3) As used in this chapter, "doing business in Washington state," with reference to an out-of-state trust institution, means purposely availing oneself of regularly transacting trust business with the public in Washington state, or otherwise seeking to regularly transact trust business with the public in Washington state by means of solicitation, which the director may so determine if all or part of the administration of any trust or other agreement to conduct trust business is administered or sought to be administered in Washington state, or if a trust or other trust business agreement, with the assent of the out-of-state trust institution, specifies Washington state as the situs of the trust or situs of the tangible or intangible property covered by the trust business agreement.

[ 2019 c 389 s 47; 2014 c 37 s 366.]